Massachusetts, session 194th, H16.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14 of Chapter 34 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
In addition to such powers and duties as may otherwise be conferred or imposed by law,
the commissioners may provide for erecting and repairing jails and other necessary public
buildings within and for the use of their county, but no money shall be paid or liability incurred
therefor in excess of the amount specifically authorized by the advisory boards on county
expenditures, except for emergency repairs, and no bills for construction or enlargement of a jail,
house of correction or reformatory shall be incurred or paid until the plans therefor have been
approved by the commissioner of correction, except as otherwise provided. They shall have
authority to represent their county, and to have the care of its property and the management of its
business and affairs in cases where not otherwise expressly provided; to sell and convey any real
estate of the county by deed, sealed with the county seal, signed and acknowledged by them, or
of 2

to lease any real estate of the county; to adopt a county seal, which shall be in the custody of
their clerk and affixed to all processes requiring it; provided, however, that the sale of any county
owned real estate customarily used by the county or sheriff for the housing of prisoners,
including any jail, house of correction, or other such facility shall be made at fair market value
and the net proceeds of any such sale shall be used for the construction of new jails, jail additions
or temporary jail facilities, to reimburse the commonwealth for expenditures for such purposes or
to reimburse the commonwealth for loans made to a county for the purpose of maintaining and
operating the county; and provided, further, that any real estate offered for sale or lease, by a
county shall first be offered in writing to the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance who shall determine whether any other state agency, as defined by section 1 of
chapter 7C, has a current or foreseeable direct public use for the property. The commissioner
shall have no fewer than 90 days to accept the offer to acquire, through a sale or lease, the
property, and upon the non-acceptance by the commissioner of any such offer, shall then be
offered in writing for sale or lease to the city or town where such land is located.
of 2